Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-1902
Terms, defined.

As used in sections 43-1901 to 43-1906, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Board means the Nebraska Child Abuse Prevention Fund Board;

(2) Department means the Department of Health and Human Services; and

(3) Fund means the Nebraska Child Abuse Prevention Fund.

Laws 1986, LB 333, § 2;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 206;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 132.